New Jersey, session 221, A2886.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a chief school administrator, or a designee, may apply to the executive county superintendent for an emergency instructional certificate for a candidate in a high-need field including, but not limited to, bilingual/bicultural education and special education if the chief school administrator, or a designee, can demonstrate the inability to locate a suitable certified candidate due to unforeseen shortages or other extenuating circumstances. The executive county superintendent may approve the application if it is determined that there are no suitable certified candidates to fill the position. b.    To be eligible to receive an emergency instructional certificate pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a teaching candidate shall, at a minimum: (1)   be enrolled in an educator preparation program at a regionally accredited four-year institution of higher education in the State; (2)   have a bachelors degree; and (3)   have achieved a passing score on any applicable subject matter knowledge exams. c.     The certificate shall be renewable annually up to a maximum of two times at the request of the chief school administrator and approval of the executive county superintendent. Renewal shall be predicated upon demonstration of progress toward successful completion of coursework and tests required for the issuance of a certificate of eligibility, certificate of eligibility with advanced standing, or a standard certificate. A candidate serving under an emergency instructional certificate shall be employed under emergency certification for no more than a total of three years in any one high-need field regardless of the number of school districts in which the candidate serves. d.    The Department of Education shall publish on its internet website a list of the high-need fields eligible to receive an emergency instructional certificate pursuant to subsection a. of this section. The State Board of Education shall annually reevaluate the list of high-need fields eligible to receive an emergency instructional certificate pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 2.    a.  An emergency instructional certificate issued pursuant to this act shall be valid for employment only in the school district requesting the emergency instructional certificate. b.    A board of education may employ a teacher candidate who has been issued an emergency instructional certificate pursuant to this act in a full-time or part-time teaching position. c.     No more than 10 percent of a board of educations teaching staff shall be employed with an emergency instructional certificate issued pursuant to this act. 3.    The State Board of Education shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), any rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year next following the date of enactment.